Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1079.02
Genetically engineered plant organism, defined.

Genetically engineered plant organism shall mean an organism altered or produced through genetic modification from a donor, vector, or recipient organism using recombinant deoxyribonucleic acid techniques.

Laws 1993, LB 406, § 9.